Washington statutes.
RCW 24.24.090

Certificates of capital stock.

All certificates of capital stock of corporations incorporated under or becoming subject to the provisions of this chapter shall have expressly stated on the face thereof that such corporation and its capital stock and the rights of stockholders therein are subject to the provisions of this chapter and that its capital stock is not assignable or transferable except as in this chapter provided.

[ 1927 c 190 s 9; RRS s 3887-9.]